Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska
37-1016
Cowboy Trail; Game and Parks Commission;
lease or transfer of portions authorized.

The Game and Parks Commission may lease
or otherwise transfer portions of the Cowboy Trail to a political subdivision.
The commission may lease portions of the Cowboy Trail to a nonprofit organization.
The lessee or transferee shall maintain the property at its own expense. Any
such lease or transfer shall be subject to the requirements of the federal
National Trails System Act, 16 U.S.C. 1241, as such act and section existed
on January 1, 2013.

Laws 2013, LB493, § 1.